Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1806
Exceptions to indictment; time allowed.

The court shall allow the accused a reasonable time to examine the indictment and prepare exceptions thereto.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 438, p. 822;

R.S.1913, § 9082;

C.S.1922, § 10107;

C.S.1929, § 29-1805;

R.S.1943, § 29-1806.